Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:Beginning January 1, 2027, every hospital that operates an emergency department shall maintain a supply of rabies medication for postexposure prophylaxis to allow for a first dose to be provided, as medically indicated, upon arrival at the emergency department. The hospital shall arrange for the additional doses necessary to complete the patient's course of treatment either by maintaining a stock of the rabies medication for postexposure prophylaxis on the premises or by making alternative arrangements to have the rabies medication available in a timely manner.--- END ---